Utah statutes.
75-6-107.   Rights of creditors.
No multiple-party account will be effective against an estate of a deceased
party to transfer to a survivor sums needed to pay debts, taxes, and expenses
of administration, including statutory allowances to the surviving spouse,
minor children and dependent children, if other assets of the estate are
insufficient. A surviving party, P.O.D. payee, or beneficiary who receives
payment from a multiple-party account after the death of a deceased party
shall be liable to account to his personal representative for amounts the
decedent owned beneficially immediately before his death to the extent
necessary to discharge the claims and charges mentioned above remaining unpaid
after application of the decedent's estate. No proceeding to assert this
liability shall be commenced unless the personal representative has received a
written demand by a surviving spouse, a creditor, or one acting for a minor or
dependent child of the decedent; and no proceeding shall be commenced later
than two years following the death of the decedent. Sums recovered by the
personal representative shall be administered as part of the decedent's
estate. This section shall not affect the right of a financial institution to
make payment on multiple-party accounts according to the terms thereof or make
it liable to the estate of a deceased party unless before payment the
institution has been served with process in a proceeding by the personal
representative.
